Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 5.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201077-362.02
Department of Motor Vehicles; provide
information to Department of Revenue.

In order to assist the Department of Revenue
in carrying out its duties, the Department of Motor Vehicles shall provide
information about individuals holding an operator's or driver's license or
a state identification card under the Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act
to the Department of Revenue in a manner agreed to by the Department of Revenue
and the Department of Motor Vehicles. The information shall include:

(1) The individual's
name;

(2) The individual's address of record;

(3) The individual's social
security number, if available and permissible under law, and the individual's
date of birth;

(4) The type of license, permit, or card held;

(5) The issuance
date of the license, permit, or card;

(6) The expiration date of the license,
permit, or card; and

(7) The status of the license, permit, or card.

The Department
of Revenue may enter into agreements with the Director of Motor Vehicles to
carry out this section.

Laws 2010, LB879, § 5.

Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act, see section 60-462.